Vermont, session 2025-2026, S80.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
Digital addictions, whether mild or severe, are increasingly prevalent in
modern society, especially among the younger population. Mindless scrolling
on a digital device or overuse of video games stifles creativity, productivity,
and motivation and often leads to dependence on engaging in digital activities.
The establishment of the Vermont Digital Addictions Awareness Day is
VT LEG #379872 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.80
2025 Page 2 of 3
intended to raise public awareness of the problem and hopefully encourage
families and individuals to explore the outdoors and to visit Vermont State
parks and historic sites.
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 378 is added to read:
§ 378. VERMONT DIGITAL ADDICTIONS AWARENESS DAY
The last Saturday in the month of July is designated as Vermont Digital
Addictions Awareness Day.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 2603 is amended to read:
§ 2603. POWERS AND DUTIES: COMMISSIONER
* * *
(c)(1) The Commissioner, subject to the direction and approval of the
Secretary, shall adopt and publish rules in the name of the Agency for the use
of State forests, or park lands, including reasonable fees or charges for the use
of lands, roads, camping sites, buildings, and other facilities and for the
harvesting of timber or removal of minerals or other resources from such lands,
notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 603.
* * *
(5) On Digital Addictions Awareness Day, as established in accordance
with 1 V.S.A. § 378, the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation,
pursuant to the fee setting authority of the Commissioner set forth in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall waive the one-day entry fee to State
VT LEG #379872 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.80
2025 Page 3 of 3
parks for families and individuals. Dependent upon the finances of the
Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Commissioner may limit this
waiver to residents of the State of Vermont.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379872 v.1